Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 4. Radiation and Hazardous Waste Protection.

Cross references. —

For radiation protection, see AS

18.60.475

—

18.60.545

; for provisions on atomic energy, see AS 18.45.

Administrative Code. —

For solid waste management, see 18 AAC 60.

Collateral references. —

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Energy and Power Sources, § 404 et seq.

61C Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, §§ 1052 et seq., 1469 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 161.

State regulation of nuclear power plants. 82 ALR3d 751.

Tort liability for nonmedical radiological harm. 73 ALR4th 582.

Sec. 46.03.250.
Authority.

The department shall adopt regulations

establishing standards governing the discharge of low level radioactive materials to the air, water, land, and subsurface land of the state;

establishing safeguards for radioactive waste materials that do not constitute a threat to public health or safety and that may be stored or disposed of in the state; and

establishing procedures for the storage and disposal of radioactive materials used in medicine, education, instruments, industrial testing, or scientific research.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 172 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For registration of ionizing radiation sources, see 18 AAC 85, art. 1.

For industrial radiography protection requirements, see 18 AAC 85, art. 5.

Sec. 46.03.260.
Use of radioactive materials.

A person who conducts an operation that results in the discharge of low level radioactive materials to the air, water, land, or subsurface land of the state shall obtain a permit from the department before commencing the discharge.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 5 ch 172 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For registration of ionizing radiation sources, see 18 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use of x-rays in the healing arts, see 18 AAC 85, art. 3.

For use of sealed radioactive sources in the healing arts, see 18 AAC 85, art. 4.

For industrial radiography protection requirements, see 18 AAC 85, art. 5.

For microwave radiation protection limits, see 18 AAC 85, art. 6.

For laser protection standards, see 18 AAC 85, art. 7.

Secs. 46.03.270 — 46.03.280.
Electronic product radiation; notification of violation and order of abatement.
[Repealed, § 12 ch 172 SLA 1978.
For radiation protection, see AS 18.60.475 — 18.60.545.]

Sec. 46.03.290.
[Renumbered as AS 46.03.865.]

Sec. 46.03.296.
Disposal of hazardous wastes.

It is unlawful to dispose of hazardous wastes in the state unless

the waste has been treated and disposed of in a manner that uses the maximum degree of reduction of the harmful qualities of a hazardous waste that is subject to this chapter and that the department, on a case-by-case basis, determines is achievable for the hazardous waste by application of production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques, taking into account energy, environmental, and economic impacts and other costs; and

the waste is disposed of in a manner that will ensure the protection of human health, livestock, wildlife, property, and the environment.

The department shall adopt regulations in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for the treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous wastes to ensure the protection of human health, livestock, wildlife, property, and the environment.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For standards applicable to a generator, see 18 AAC 62, art. 2.

For treatment, storage, and disposal, see 18 AAC 62, art. 4.

For standards applicable to specific hazardous wastes and facilities, see 18 AAC 62, art. 5.

For land disposal restrictions, see 18 AAC 62, art. 6.

For hazardous waste facility permit, see 18 AAC 62, art. 7.

For applicability and basic requirements, see 18 AAC 63, art. 1.

For surface oiling, see 18 AAC 75, art. 7.

Sec. 46.03.299.
Hazardous waste regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for the identification and management of hazardous waste as defined by the Environmental Protection Agency and hazardous waste that exhibits the characteristic of toxicity, persistence, or carcinogenicity.

Regulations adopted under (a) of this section must exempt from their coverage mining waste and waste associated with the exploration, development, or production of crude oil, natural gas, or geothermal energy until studies required under 42 U.S.C. 6982(f) and (m) are completed. The department, after considering the findings in the reports of these studies, may terminate or amend the exemptions.

The department shall take all actions necessary to receive authorization from the administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency to administer and enforce a hazardous waste program in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 6901 — 6987 (Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976).

Regulations adopted under (a) of this section shall cover (1) hazardous waste, not otherwise exempted by law, that is generated in any month by a single generator in an amount of 220 pounds or more, and (2) acute hazardous wastes identified in 40 C.F.R. 261.33(e), not otherwise exempted by law, that are generated in any month by a single generator in an amount of 2.2 pounds or more. The department shall extend the regulations to manage smaller quantities of hazardous waste if the quantities specified in this subsection exceed the quantities regulated under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 6921 — 6934, as amended. The department may at any time extend coverage of regulations adopted under (a) of this section to small quantities of hazardous waste and acute hazardous waste.

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 88 SLA 1990.]

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1984; am §§ 55, 61 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 88 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For identification of hazardous waste, see 18 AAC 62, art. 1.

For standards applicable to a generator, see 18 AAC 62, art. 2.

For standards applicable to a transporter, see 18 AAC 62, art. 3.

For treatment, storage, and disposal, see 18 AAC 62, art. 4.

For standards applicable to specific hazardous wastes and facilities, see 18 AAC 62, art. 5.

For land disposal restrictions, see 18 AAC 62, art. 6.

For hazardous waste facility permit, see 18 AAC 62, art. 7.

For applicability and basic requirements, see 18 AAC 63, art. 1.

For surface oiling, see 18 AAC 75, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state is empowered to adopt hazardous waste regulations that are the same as or broader than the federal regulations, but is prohibited from adopting a regulatory program less stringent than the federal equivalent. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

Sec. 46.03.300.
Exceptions. [Repealed, § 12 ch 172 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 46.03.302.
Hazardous waste permit.

A person may not treat, transport, store, or dispose of a hazardous waste as defined by the department by regulation unless that person first secures a permit from the department and submits to the department any reports or manifests that the department may require for handling the hazardous wastes.

A person who generates hazardous waste is not required to obtain a permit under (a) of this section unless the person also treats, transports, stores, or disposes of the hazardous waste.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For treatment, storage, and disposal, see 18 AAC 62, art. 4.

For standards applicable to specific hazardous wastes and facilities, see 18 AAC 62, art. 5.

For land disposal restrictions, see 18 AAC 62, art. 6.

For hazardous waste facility permit, see 18 AAC 62, art. 7.

For applicability and basic requirements, see 18 AAC 63, art. 1.

Sec. 46.03.305.
Hazardous waste reports and manifests.

A person who generates hazardous wastes shall submit to the department reports or manifests that the department may require for handling the hazardous wastes.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For standards applicable to a generator, see 18 AAC 62, art. 2.

For standards applicable to a transporter, see 18 AAC 62, art. 3.

Sec. 46.03.308.
Transportation of hazardous waste.

Hazardous waste may not be transported in the state unless the waste is accompanied by the uniform hazardous waste manifest required under 42 U.S.C. 6922 — 6923 or other applicable federal law.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 71 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1984; am §§ 13, 15 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For standards applicable to a transporter, see 18 AAC 62, art. 3.

Sec. 46.03.309.
Temporary collection of hazardous waste.

The department shall provide for the temporary collection of hazardous waste to be prepared for shipment to a federally approved hazardous waste disposal site.
The department shall establish four periods in each calendar year during which it shall collect hazardous waste.
A collection point may accept hazardous waste only from small quantity generators and household generators as defined by the Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

(§ 3 ch 77 SLA 1984)

Sec. 46.03.310.
Conflicting laws.
[Repealed, § 12 ch 172 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 46.03.311.
Public records.

Permits, permit applications, records, reports, and information and documentation obtained under AS

46.03.302

—

46.03.308

are available to the public for inspection and copying. However, upon a showing satisfactory to the commissioner that a record, report, permit, application, or information would, if made public, divulge methods or processes entitled to protection as trade secrets, the commissioner shall treat the record, report, permit, application, or information as confidential.

Information that is confidential may be transmitted under a continuing restriction of confidentiality to other officers, employees, or authorized representatives of the state or of the United States if

the person responsible for furnishing the record, report, permit, application, or information to which the information pertains is informed at least two weeks before the transmittal; and

the information has been acquired by the department under the provisions of AS

46.03.296

—

46.03.311

.

This section does not limit the department’s authority to release confidential information during emergency situations.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For standards applicable to a generator, see 18 AAC 62, art. 2.

For standards applicable to a transporter, see 18 AAC 62, art. 3.

For treatment, storage, and disposal, see 18 AAC 62, art. 4.

For hazardous waste facility permit, see 18 AAC 62, art. 7.

Sec. 46.03.313.
Hazardous waste management facilities and sites.

The department shall evaluate and select potential sites for hazardous waste management facilities in the state. In evaluating and selecting sites for management facilities, the department shall consider at least the following factors:

economic feasibility, including proximity to concentrations of generators of the types of hazardous waste likely to be proposed and permitted for management;

intrinsic suitability of the sites;

federal and state pollution control and environmental protection regulations;

the risk and effect for local residents, units of government, and the local public health, safety, and welfare, including such dangers as an accidental release of waste during transportation to a facility or at a facility, water, air, and land pollution, and fire or explosion;

the consistency of a facility with, and its effect on, existing and planned local land use and development; local laws, ordinances, and permits; and local public facilities and services; and

the adverse effects of a facility at the site on agriculture and natural resources and opportunities to mitigate or eliminate the adverse effects by stipulations, conditions, and requirements relating to the design and operation of a management facility at the proposed site.

The department shall adopt regulations that

interpret and clarify the factors listed in (a) of this section; and

establish procedures for processing, reviewing, and approving or disapproving applications for the siting and operation of privately owned hazardous waste management facilities.

The department may authorize the siting and operation of privately owned hazardous waste management facilities in accordance with factors and requirements established under this section.

The department shall hold public hearings in each house district in which a hazardous waste management facility site is proposed to be located. The department shall give reasonable public notice of the time, date, and place of each public hearing at least 30 days before the hearing. The public shall be afforded an opportunity at each hearing to submit written and oral testimony concerning a potential site.

In this section, “intrinsic suitability” of a site means that, based on existing data on the inherent and natural attributes, physical features, and location of the site, there is no known reason why a waste management facility that may be located in the site could not reasonably be expected to qualify for a permit under AS

46.03.302

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 77 SLA 1984; am §§ 57, 58 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 97 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability and basic requirements, see 18 AAC 63, art. 1.

For requirements for hazardous waste or PCB incinerators, hazardous waste land facilities, chemical waste landfills, and hazardous waste underground injection wells, see 18 AAC 63, art. 2.

For review criteria, see 18 AAC 63, art. 3.

Sec. 46.03.314.
Reports on management sites and facilities. [Repealed, § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 46.03.316.
Hazardous waste reduction and recycling program. [Repealed, § 4 ch 88 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 46.03.317.
Hazardous waste reduction matching grants.

A hazardous waste reduction grant account is established in the general fund. It consists of appropriations made to it.

The department may issue matching grants from money in the account to businesses, local governments, industry trade associations, labor organizations, or nonprofit organizations for the purpose of feasibility analysis and evaluation of ways to implement hazardous waste reduction.

Grants under this section

must be matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis by the grantee in cash or in kind;

may not exceed $10,000 for any single proposal or project.

The department shall establish an advisory committee, consisting of five members, to assist the department in reviewing and evaluating grant applications under this section. The advisory committee must include

an officer or employee of the department;

a representative of the University of Alaska;

a professional civil or chemical engineer with experience in environmental engineering;

an owner or representative of a small business; and

a public member.

History.

(§ 3 ch 97 SLA 1989)